Washington statutes.
RCW 43.59.080

Governor's duties as chair.

The governor as chair of said commission shall have the authority to appoint advisory committees as he or she may deem advisable to aid, advise and assist the commission in carrying out the purposes of this chapter. All actions and decisions, however, shall be made by the commission.

[ 2009 c 549 s 5144; 1967 ex.s. c 147 s 9.]